South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5547.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Notwithstanding Sections 1-11-58 and 25-1-1660 of the S.C. Code, the Department of Administration, the State Fiscal Accountability Authority, or the appropriate agency, is directed to transfer ownership of the National Guard Armory located at 620 John G. Rose Drive in Timmonsville, South Carolina, to the City of Timmonsville. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----